Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 6. Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi Law

§ 77-6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-3.
Legislative intent.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that certain municipalities of this state now own and operate gas distribution systems to serve their citizens, inhabitants and customers by providing them with gas for all purposes; and if such municipalities are to furnish, and if the members of the public in the areas they serve are to receive adequate service, such municipalities must have adequate, dependable and economical sources of gas supplies. The Legislature declares that there exists in this state a need for an authority to function without profit in developing, obtaining and promoting for the public good in this state adequate, dependable and economical sources and supplies of gas for the purposes expressed in this section, and to assist in the financing of additions and other expenditures for the municipal gas systems of such municipalities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-5.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means the Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi and any successor thereto. Any change in name or composition of the authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any person under this chapter or impair the obligations of any contract existing under this chapter.

“Bond anticipation notes” or “notes” means obligations issued after validation of bonds and in anticipation of the issuance of the bonds as validated.

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means any bonds issued by the authority under this chapter, including refunding bonds.

“Cost of project” or “cost of construction” means all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of such project and facilities related thereto including land and any leases, rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, water rights, mineral rights, fees, permits, approvals, licenses and certificates, and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses and certificates and the preparation of applications therefor and including all machinery and equipment, including equipment for use in connection with such construction; financing charges; working capital; interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may determine; operating expenses during such period as the authority may determine; costs of engineering, geological, economic, architectural and legal services; costs of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; costs of insurance or of self-insuring any project; administrative expenses; amounts payable under any judgment against the authority; environmental mitigation costs; all costs associated with acquiring the contract rights or other contractual arrangements for the short-term or long-term provision of gas supplies including reserves, transmission, distribution, storage, peaking or other services associated therewith including prepayments for such; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing and is authorized by this chapter. All funds paid or advanced for any of the purposes mentioned in this paragraph by municipalities contracting with the authority prior to the issuance of any of the authority’s bonds or notes may be refunded to such municipalities out of the proceeds of any bonds or notes so issued. The cost of any project may also include a fund or funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds or bond anticipation notes may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the purposes mentioned in this paragraph shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds or notes issued under this chapter for such project.

“Distribution” means the conveyance of gas to members of the authority and hence to the ultimate consumer.

“Exploration” means the processes, properties, activities and facilities used for the discovery of deposits of gas, and the study and implementation of enhanced gas recovery methods.

“Gas” means either natural or synthetic gas, including propane, manufactured gas, methane from coal beds, geothermal gas, and mixtures thereof, whether in gaseous or liquid form, or any byproduct resulting therefrom.

“Governing authorities” means the legislative body, council, board of commissioners, board of aldermen, state agency, other body charged by law with governing the municipality or other entity eligible to be a member hereof.

“Governing board” means the legislative body, council, board of trustees, board of commissioners or other body charged by law with governing the municipality or authority.

“Local distribution company” means any person, other than any interstate pipeline or any intrastate pipeline, engaged in the transportation, or local distribution, of natural gas and the sale of natural gas for ultimate consumption.

“Municipality” means a city, county or other political subdivision or agency of a state.

“Production” means the physical activities, processes, properties and facilities for development, manufacture, synthesis, production, coal gasification, extraction, gathering of gas or conversion of one form of gas to another.

“Project,” “undertaking” or “facility” means any plant, works, system, facility, and real and personal property of any nature whatsoever together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, and any contract rights relating to the storage, acquisition, distribution, transmission, purchase, sale, exchange or interchange of gas and relating to the acquisition, transportation, or storage of natural gas, or any interest in or right to the use, services, enrichment, output or capacity of any such plant, works, system or facilities. “Project” or “undertaking” as used in this paragraph is intended to include contracts and contract rights as well as tangible property. “Project,” “undertaking” or “facility” shall not include any plant, works, system, facility or real or personal property of any nature whatsoever, or any parts thereof or appurtenances thereto, relating to exploration or production.

“Revenue anticipation notes” means obligations issued by the authority for the purpose of meeting the current and necessary expenses of the authority as provided for in Section 77-6-77.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Storage” means any process, properties, activities or facilities used to hold, store or maintain gas.

“System” means those properties, facilities, projects, contractual rights or combination thereof of the authority which are designated by the authority as constituting a specific combination for the purposes of financing such, or for the purposes of providing gas supplies or services to a specified group of municipalities or to a specified geographic area.

“Transmission” means the transfer of gas by the authority from its acquisition site to, between or among cities or municipal gas agencies or other persons with whom they may contract.

“Utility commission” means the legislative body, board of commissioners or body charged by law with the control, management and operation of gas production, transmission or distribution systems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 324, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2003).

§ 77-6-7.
Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi created; purpose; initial membership; principal office.

There shall be created a local distribution company of the state to be known as the Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi for the purpose of undertaking the planning, financing, development, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment, operation and maintenance of a project or projects to supply gas for present or future needs as an alternative or supplemental method of obtaining the benefits and assuming the responsibilities of ownership in a project. In determining whether or not membership in the authority for such purpose is in the best interests of the municipalities, the utility commissions shall take into consideration, but shall not be limited to the following:

Whether or not a separate entity may be able to finance the cost of projects in a more efficient and economical manner;

Whether or not better financial market acceptance may result if one (1) entity is responsible for issuing all of the bonds required for a project or projects in a timely and orderly manner and with a uniform credit rating instead of multiple entities issuing separate issues of bonds;

Whether or not savings and other advantages may be obtained by providing a separate entity responsible for the acquisition, construction, ownership and operation of a project or projects; and

Whether or not the existence of such a separate entity will foster the continuation of joint planning and undertaking of projects, and the resulting economies and efficiencies to be derived from such joint planning and undertaking.

If a utility commission shall determine that it is in the best interest of the municipality to become a member of the Municipal Gas Authority of Mississippi, it shall adopt a resolution so finding, which need not prescribe in detail the basis for the determination, and which shall set forth the names of the municipalities which are proposed to be initial members of the authority. Said resolution shall be certified to the governing authorities who shall thereupon disapprove or ratify the determination of said utility commission by resolution or ordinance spread upon its official minutes. The governing authorities shall cause notice of such determination to be given to the presiding officer of the utility commission of the municipality, which utility commission shall thereupon appoint in writing one (1) commissioner of the authority, which commissioner may, in the discretion of the utility commission, be an officer or employee of the municipality.

All such resolutions of intent to become initial members of the authority shall be presented, by the appointed commissioner of such utility commission, at its organizational meeting which shall be held in the old Supreme Court chamber of the New Capitol at 2:00 p.m. on May 16, 1988. The commissioners shall organize and elect a chairman and other such officers as may be desirable in the determination of the commissioners.

The authority shall have its principal office in Hinds County and its legal situs or residence for the purposes of this chapter shall be Hinds County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-9.
Membership in authority after its creation; withdrawal.

After the creation of the authority, any other municipality may become a member thereof upon application to such authority after the adoption of a resolution by the utility commission of the municipality setting forth the determination and finding prescribed in Section 77-6-7, and the adoption by the governing authorities of the municipality of a resolution or ordinance ratifying the determination of the utility commission and authorizing said municipality to participate, and with the majority consent of the members of the authority evidenced by the resolutions of their respective utility commissions. Any municipality may withdraw from the authority, provided that all contractual rights acquired and obligations incurred while a municipality was a member shall remain in full force and effect. The withdrawing municipality shall continue to honor its obligations entered into while a member of the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-11.
Board of commissioners.

The authority shall consist of a board of commissioners appointed by the respective utility commissions of the municipalities which are members of the authority. Each municipality shall appoint one (1) commissioner who may, at the discretion of the municipality, be an officer or employee of the municipality, the appointment to be made by resolution. Each commissioner shall have one (1) vote. Each commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the utility commission by which he was appointed. Each appointed commissioner before entering upon his duties shall enter into bond with a corporate surety in an amount not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties, and shall take and subscribe to an oath, before some person authorized by law to administer oaths, to execute the duties of his office faithfully and impartially, and such bond and oath shall be filed with the governing authority of the appointing municipality and spread upon its minutes. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the municipality.

The board of commissioners of the authority shall annually elect one (1) of the commissioners as chairman, another as vice-chairman, and another person or persons who may but need not be commissioners to serve as treasurer, secretary and, if desired, assistant secretary. The treasurer shall enter into bond with a corporate surety in such amount of not less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), as may be determined by the commissioners. The office of treasurer may be held by the secretary or assistant secretary. The board of commissioners may also appoint such additional officers as it deems necessary. The secretary or assistant secretary of the authority shall keep a record of the proceedings of the authority, and the secretary shall be the custodian of all records, books, documents and papers filed with the authority, the minute book or journal of the authority and its official seal. Either the secretary or the assistant secretary of the authority may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and may give certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely upon such certificates.

A majority of the commissioners of the authority then in office shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the board of commissioners of the authority shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. Any action taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted. A majority of the votes which the commissioners present are entitled to cast shall be necessary and sufficient to take any action or to pass any resolution, provided that such commissioners present are entitled to cast a majority of the votes of all commissioners of the board. Any commissioner may participate and vote in regular or special meetings of the board, as well as meetings of various committees of the board, via telecommunications or electronic means, and such participation and voting shall have the same effect as if the commissioner were physically present at such meetings. Any meeting of the board of commissioners or of a committee of the board at which one or more of the commissioners is participating via telecommunications or electronic means shall be subject to the Open Meetings Law (Chapter 41, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972), and all discussions during the meeting via telecommunications or electronic means, other than discussions held in executive session, must be open to the public. Notice of any meeting at which one or more commissioners may be participating via telecommunications or electronic means shall specify the location at which the meeting will be open to the public.

No commissioner of the authority shall receive any compensation for the performance of his duties hereunder; however, each commissioner, other than a commissioner participating in a meeting via telecommunications or electronic means, may be paid a per diem as provided by Section 25-3-69 while engaged in the performance of such duties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 29, 2001).

§ 77-6-13.
Executive committee of board of commissioners.

The board of commissioners of the authority may create an executive committee of the board of commissioners. The board may provide for the composition of the executive committee so as to afford, in its judgment, fair representation of the member municipalities. The executive committee shall have and exercise such of the powers and authority of the board of commissioners during intervals between the board’s meetings as may be prescribed by its rules, motions or resolutions. The terms of office of the members of the executive committee and the method of filling vacancies therein shall be fixed by the rules of the board of commissioners of the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-15.
Rights and powers of authority.

The authority shall have all of the rights and powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the rights and powers:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of the affairs and the conduct of its business, and to prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To sue and be sued in its own name, and to plead and be impleaded;

To receive, administer and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any gift, grant or donation of any property or money;

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of, any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, including rights-of-way or other interests in land less than the fee thereof;

To sell, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, or to grant options for any such purposes with respect to, any real or personal property or interest therein;

To pledge or assign any money, rents, charges or other revenues and any proceeds derived by the authority from the sales of property, insurance or condemnation awards;

To issue bonds of the authority for the purpose of providing funds for any of its corporate purposes;

To study, plan, finance, construct, reconstruct, acquire, improve, enlarge, extend, better, own, operate and maintain, one or more projects, either individually or jointly, with one or more municipalities in this state or any other state or with any agencies or instrumentalities of any state, or any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the production, transmission, distribution or end-use of gas within this state or any other state, and to pay all or any part of the costs thereof from the proceeds of bonds of the authority or from any other funds made available to the authority;

To authorize the construction, operation or maintenance of any project or projects by any person, firm or corporation, including municipalities and agencies of any state, or of the United States;

To acquire by lease, purchase or otherwise an existing project or a project under construction, or any interest therein, or portion thereof;

With the consent of sixty percent (60%) of the member municipalities, to sell or otherwise dispose of any project or projects, or any interest therein or portion thereof. The member municipalities may enter into an agreement with the authority whereby certain types of property may be traded or otherwise disposed of without unanimous consent of the member municipalities;

To fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for gas and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through any project;

To transmit, distribute, exchange or purchase gas, and to enter into contracts for any or all such purposes;

To negotiate and enter into contracts for the purchase, sale, exchange, interchange, transportation, pooling, transmission, distribution, storage and processing of natural gas or use of gas with any municipality in this state or any other state owning gas distribution facilities, or with any municipalities, agencies or instrumentalities of any other state or with any gas association, any public or private utility, and any state, federal or municipal agency which owns gas production, transmission or distribution facilities end-use in this state or any other state;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority under this chapter, including contracts with persons, firms, corporations and others;

To apply to the appropriate agencies of the state, the United States or any state thereof, and to any other proper agency for such permits, licenses, certificates or approvals as may be necessary to provide services, and to construct, maintain and operate projects in accordance with, and to obtain, hold and use, such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals in the same manner as any other person or operating unit of any other person;

To employ engineers, architects, geologists, economists, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, financial advisors and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the authority and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the authority therefor;

To purchase all kinds of insurance including, but not limited to, insurance against business interruption, and/or risks of damage to property;

To purchase gas and related services from any source on behalf of its members and other customers and to sell the same to its members and other customers in such amounts, with such characteristics, for such periods of time and under such terms and conditions as the board of commissioners shall determine;

To do any and all things necessary and proper to reduce the cost of gas furnished to municipalities contracting with the authority including, without limitation, entering into interest rate swaps and other arrangements for restructuring the authority’s capitalization;

To provide management, technical, financial, informational, promotional and educational services to and for the benefit of the municipalities;

To do any and all things necessary, convenient or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this chapter and to exercise the powers granted to the authority herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 8; Laws, 2002, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2002).

§ 77-6-17.
Projects requiring financing by bonds; approval required; determination by authority; notice of determination; hearing; appeal from determination.

The authority shall not undertake any project required to be financed, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of bonds without the approval of sixty percent (60%) of its members. Before undertaking such project, required to be financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of bonds, the authority shall, based upon engineering studies and reports, determine that such project is required to provide for the projected needs for gas of its members from and after the date the project is estimated to be placed in normal and continuous operation and for a reasonable period of time thereafter. In determining the future gas requirements of the members of the authority, there shall be taken into account the following:

The economies and efficiencies estimated to be achieved in acquiring, constructing and operating the proposed facilities for the transmission of gas.

The estimated requirements for gas and for reserve capacity and to meet obligations under pooling and reserve sharing agreements reasonably related to its needs for gas to which the authority is or may become a party; and

The cost of such existing alternative gas supply sources.

A determination by the authority based upon appropriate findings of the foregoing matters shall be conclusive as to the appropriateness of a project to provide the needs of the members of the authority for gas unless an interested party aggrieved by the determination of said authority shall file an appeal therefrom as herein provided. Notice of the determination by the authority shall be published one (1) time in one or more newspapers having general circulation in each of the municipalities constituting the membership of the authority and shall specify a date, not less than ten (10) days after the publication of such notice, at which the authority shall meet to hear any objections or remonstrances that may be made. At said meeting, the commissioners of the authority shall consider the objections or protests, if any, and shall at said meeting, or at any adjourned meeting, affirm, modify or rescind the determination. Any person or party objecting or protesting the determination at said meeting who is aggrieved by the action of said authority may appeal within ten (10) days from the date of adjournment at which session the authority rendered said determination, and may embody the facts and determination in a bill of exceptions which shall be signed by the person acting as chairman of the board of commissioners of the authority. The secretary thereof shall transmit at once the bill of exceptions to the circuit court of the county in which the principal office of the authority is located, and the court shall either in termtime or in vacation hear and determine the same on the case as presented by the bill of exceptions as an appellate court, and shall affirm or reverse the determination of the authority. If the determination of the authority be reversed, the circuit court shall certify the same to the board of commissioners of the authority. Costs shall be awarded as in other cases. The authority may employ counsel to defend such appeals to be paid out of the funds of the authority. Any such appeal may be heard and determined in vacation in the discretion of the court on motion of either party on written notice of ten (10) days to the other party or parties or the attorney of record, and the hearing of the same shall be held in the county where the suit is pending unless the judge in his order shall otherwise direct. Provided, however, no appeal to the circuit court shall be taken from any order or determination of the authority which authorizes the issuance or sale of bonds, but all objections to any matters relating to the issuance or sale of bonds shall be adjudicated and determined by the chancery court, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 31-13-5 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent the authority from undertaking studies to determine whether there is a need for a project or whether such project is feasible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-19.
Municipalities that may contract with authority.

The municipalities with which the authority shall be authorized to contract to provide a gas supply pursuant to this chapter shall be those municipalities of this state or any other state who may distribute or be end-users thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-21.
Contracts to buy gas from authority.

Any municipality which is a member of the authority may contract to buy from the authority gas required for its present or future requirements, including the capacity and output of one or more specified projects. As the creation of the authority is an alternative method, among other things, whereby a municipality may obtain the benefits and assume the responsibilities of ownership in a project, any such contract may provide that the municipality so contracting shall be obligated to make the payments required by the contract whether or not a project is completed, operable, operating, retired or decommissioned and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction, curtailment or termination of the output of a project or the gas contracted for, and that such payments under the contract shall not be subject to any reduction whether by offset or otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance of the authority or any other member of the authority under the contract or any other instrument. Any contract with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity or output of a project entered into between the authority and its member municipalities may also provide that if one or more of such municipalities shall withdraw from the authority or default in the payment of its or their obligations, with respect to the purchase of said capacity or output, then in that event the remaining member municipalities which are purchasing capacity and output under the contract shall be required to accept and pay for and shall be entitled proportionately to and may use or otherwise dispose of the capacity or output which was to be purchased by the defaulting municipality.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, any such contracts with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity, output or gas from a project may extend for a period not exceeding fifty (50) years from the date a project is estimated to be placed in normal continuous operation; and the execution and effectiveness thereof shall not be subject to any authorizations or approvals by the state or any agency, commission or instrumentality or municipality thereof except as in this chapter specifically required and provided.

Payments by a municipality under any contract for the purchase of capacity and output from the authority shall be made solely from the revenues derived from the ownership and operation of the gas system of said municipality, or other revenues when applicable, and any obligation under such contract shall not constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien or encumbrance upon any property of the municipality or upon any of its income, receipts or revenues, except the revenues of its gas system, and neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the municipality are, or may be, pledged for the payment of any obligation under any such contract. A municipality, when applicable, shall be obligated to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for gas and other services, facilities and commodities, sold, furnished or supplied through its gas system sufficient to provide revenues adequate to meet its obligations under any such contract and to pay any and all other amounts payable from or constituting a charge and lien upon such revenues, including amounts sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on bonds heretofore or hereafter issued by the municipality for purposes related to its gas system.

Any municipality which is a member of the authority may furnish the authority with money derived solely from the ownership and operation of its gas system or facilities and may make available for the use of the authority any personnel, equipment and property, both real and personal, which is a part of its gas system or facilities, and any other agency or end-user shall pay from any and all revenues available.

Any member of the authority may contract for, advance or contribute funds derived solely from the ownership and operation of its gas system or facilities to the authority as may be agreed upon by the authority and the member, and the authority shall repay such advances or contributions from proceeds of bonds, from operating revenues or from any other funds of the authority, together with interest thereon as may be agreed upon by the member and the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-23.
Excess capacity or output may be sold or exchanged.

The authority may sell or exchange the excess capacity or output of a project not then required by any of its members or with any party with whom the authority may contract for such consideration and for such period and upon such other terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties to any municipality or with any party with whom the authority may contract in this state or any other state owning gas distribution facilities, to any municipalities, agencies or instrumentalities of any other state, to any gas association, to any end-user, to any public or private utility, or to any other state, federal or municipal agency which owns gas production, transmission or distribution facilities either within or without this state. Provided, however, that sales of excess capacity or output of a project to gas associations, public or private utilities, and other persons the interest on whose securities and other obligations are not exempt from taxation by the federal government shall not be made in such amounts, for such periods of time, and under such terms and conditions as will cause the interest on bonds issued to finance the cost of a project to become taxable by the federal government.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-25.
Provisions to be construed as authorizing joint and several ownership of projects.

The definitions and all other terms and provisions of this chapter shall be construed so as to include and authorize the joint or several ownership, operation, and/or maintenance by one or more municipalities or the authority of a project, or any undivided ownership interest therein, with any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the production, transmission or distribution of gas either within or without this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-27.
Acquisition of property; contract requirements.

A municipality’s or the authority’s purchase of, contract for the acquisition of, or contract for any property, including any project or interest therein, or the construction of, or the operation and maintenance of, any project, owned or to be owned jointly by such municipality or the authority with any person, firm or corporation engaged in the production, transmission or distribution of gas, either within or without this state, other than with a municipality of this state or the authority created pursuant to this chapter, may be made or entered into without meeting the requirements of any law relating to acquisitions, purchases or contracts by competitive bids where the interest to be acquired by such municipality or the authority in such property or project is twenty-five percent (25%) or less.

If a municipality or the authority which finds and records on its minutes that acquisition of any project or any interest therein or any portion thereof, or any property or any interest therein or any portion thereof, which is authorized by this chapter is available or can be acquired or contracted for from or with a municipality or the authority or only a single source, person, firm or corporation, then such acquisition or contract may be made or entered into without meeting the requirements of any law relating to acquisitions, purchases or contracts by competitive bids. If, after advertising for competitive bids as to other proposed purchases, acquisitions or contracts, only one (1) bid is received, the municipality or the authority, as the case may be, may reject the bid and negotiate privately any purchase, contract or acquisition for a consideration not exceeding that proposed in the bid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).

§ 77-6-29.
Power to issue revenue bonds.

The authority may issue revenue bonds pledging to the payment thereof as to both principal and interest the revenues or any portion thereof, derived or to be derived from all or any of its projects, and any additions and betterments thereto or extensions thereof, or contributions or advances from its members. Bonds of the authority shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by its governing board and spread upon its minutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 515, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 16, 1988).